District of Columbia statutes.
5-119.18

Property treated as abandoned.

Any property or money returned to the Property Clerk as the proceeds of crime, and which shall not be called for as evidence by any proceeding in the courts of the District within 1 year from the date of such return, may, unless specially claimed by the owner within that time, be thereafter treated as other unclaimed, abandoned, or lost property or money, as provided in this chapter.

R.S., D.C., § 424
Disposition of unclaimed property, public or government held property, see § 41-112.
1981 Ed., § 4-169.
1973 Ed., § 4-167.